cs: Elektronika > Vybavení arkádových videoheren > Doplňky k arkádovým automatům: Grafika arkádových skříní; Mincové mechanismy; Ochranné kryty ovládacích panelů; Ovládací panely; Díly a příslušenství joysticků; Joysticky; Svítící grafika; Tlačítka; Spinery; Trackbally; Kabeláž a svazky
da: Elektronik > Arkadeudstyr > Videospil – arkadekabinetter – tilbehør: Arkadeboks – illustrationer; Møntmekanismer; Kontrolpanel-beskyttere; Kontrolpaneler; Joystick-dele og -tilbehør; Joysticks; Teltpavilloner; Trykknapper; Spinnere; Trackballs; Ledninger og ledningsnet
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Equipamento de máquinas de jogo > Acessórios de máquinas de videojogos: Arte de armário de arcade; Mecanismos de moeda; Protetores de painel de controlo; Painéis de controlo; Peças e acessórios de joystick; Joysticks; Tendas grandes; Teclas de pressão; Spinners; Trackballs; Cablagem e arneses
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 街機設備 > 電子遊戲街機配件: 街機櫃美圖; 投幣機制; 控制面板保護件; HVAC 控制面板; 搖桿零件及配件; 搖桿; 天幕帳篷; 推動按鈕; 旋轉器; 軌跡球; 佈線及線束
ko: 전자기기 > 아케이드 장비 > 비디오 게임 아케이드 캐비닛 부대용품: 아케이드 캐비닛 아트워크; 코인 메커니즘; 컨트롤 패널 보호재; 제어반; 조이스틱 부품 및 액세서리; 조이스틱; 상단 액정; 푸시 버튼; 스피너; 트랙볼; 배선 및 하니스
de: Elektronik > Spielautomatenbedarf > Zubehör für Spielautomaten: Arcade-Gehäuse-Artwork; Münzmechanismen; Bedienfeld-Schutzvorrichtungen; Schalt- & Bedienungstafeln; Joystick-Teile und -Zubehör; Joysticks; Grafikschilder; Drucktasten; Spinner; Trackballs; Verkabelung und Kabelbäume
it: Elettronica > Attrezzature giochi arcade > Accessori strutture videogiochi arcade: Grafiche per cabinet arcade; Meccanismi moneta; Protezioni del pannello di controllo; Quadri di controllo; Parti e accessori del joystick; Joystick; Tensostrutture; Pulsanti; Manopole rotanti (spinner); Trackball; Cavi e cablaggi
sv: Elektronik > Spelhallsutrustning > Tillbehör till arkadspelsautomater: Arkadskåpskonst; Myntmekanismer; Kontrollpanelsskydd; Kontrollpaneler; Joystickdelar och -tillbehör; Styrspakar; Skyltar; Tryckknappar; Vridkontroller; Styrkulor; Kablar och kabelsatser
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị game thùng > Phụ kiện tủ trò chơi video: Đồ họa tủ arcade; Cơ cấu tiền xu; Tấm bảo vệ bảng điều khiển; Bảng điều khiển; Phụ kiện và linh kiện joystick; Cần chỉnh hướng; Ô văng; Nút ấn; Núm xoay (spinner); Bi điều khiển (trackball); Dây điện và bộ dây nối
ro-RO: Electronice > Echipamente jocuri arcade > Accesorii pentru dulapuri pentru jocuri arcade video: Artă grafică pentru cabinete arcade; Mecanisme cu monedă; Protecții pentru panoul de control; Panouri de control; Piese și accesorii pentru joystick; Joystickuri; Panouri publicitare; Butoane tip ciupercă; Spinnere; Trackball-uri; Cablaje și mănunchiuri de cabluri
nl: Elektronica > Arcadeapparatuur > Accessoires voor arcadekasten voor videogames: Arcadekast artwork; Muntmechanismen; Bedieningspaneel beschermers; Bedieningspanelen; Joystick-onderdelen en accessoires; Joysticks voor arcadekasten voor videogames; Ingangen; Drukknoppen; Spinners; Trackballs; Bedrading en kabelset
fi: Elektroniikka > Pelikonetarvikkeet > Videopelien arcade-kabinettien lisätarvikkeet: Peliautomaatin kaapin taidekuvitus; Kolikkomekanismit; Ohjainpaneelin suojus; Hallintapaneelit; Joystick-osa ja lisävaruste; Joystickit; Reunukset; Painikkeet; Pyöritysvipu; Pallo-ohjain; Kaapelointi ja johtosarja
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 大型游戏机/街机 > 街机配件: 街机机台贴画; 投币装置; 控制面板保护器; 控制面板; 摇杆部件/配件; 操纵杆; 框头; 按钮; 旋转器; 轨迹球; 线缆和线束
hr-HR: Elektronika > Oprema za arkadne igre > Pribor za ormariće za arkadne videoigre: Ukrasi za arkadne ormare; Mehanizmi za novčiće; Zaštite za kontrolne ploče; Upravljačke ploče; Dijelovi i dodaci za joystick; Kontroleri; Oznake arkadnih videoigara; Pritisni gumbi; Spinneri; Trackball; Ožičenje i snopovi kabela
sk-SK: Elektronika > Arkádové vybavenie > Príslušenstvo pre skrinky s arkádovými videohrami: Grafika arkádových skríň; Mincové mechanizmy; Ochranné kryty ovládacích panelov; Ovládacie panely; Diely a príslušenstvo joystickov; Joysticky; Markízy; Tlačidlá; Otočné ovládače; Trackbally; Káble a zväzky vodičov
es: Electrónica > Artículos para videojuegos > Accesorios para muebles de videojuegos: Arte para gabinete arcade; Mecanismos de monedas; Protectores de panel de control; Paneles de control; Partes y accesorios de joystick; Palancas de mando; Carpas; Botones; Perillas giratorias (spinners); Trackballs; Cableado y arneses
en: Electronics > Arcade Equipment > Video Game Arcade Cabinet Accessories: Arcade Cabinet Artwork; Coin Mechanisms; Control Panel Protectors; Control Panels; Joystick Parts & Accessories; Joysticks; Marquees; Push Buttons; Spinners; Trackballs; Wiring & Harnesses
ru: Электроника > Игровые автоматы > Аксессуары для автоматов с видеоиграми: Художественное оформление аркадных кабинетов; Монетоприемники; Защитные накладки на панель управления; Панели управления; Запчасти и аксессуары для джойстиков; Джойстики; Вывески; Кнопки; Спиннеры; Трекболы; Проводка и кабельные жгуты
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อาร์เคด > อุปกรณ์ตู้เกมอาร์เคด: ภาพตกแต่งตู้เกม; กลไกเหรียญ; แผ่นป้องกันแผงควบคุม; แผงควบคุม; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมจอยสติ๊ก; คันโยก; ข้อความวิ่ง; ปุ่มกด; ปุ่มหมุน; แทร็กบอล; สายไฟและสายไฟรวม
bg-BG: Електроника > Оборудване за аркадни машини > Аксесоари за аркадни машини: Художествено оформление за аркадна кутия; Монетни механизми; Предпазители за контролен панел; Контролни панели; Части и аксесоари за джойстик; Джойстици; Табелки за аркадни машини; Бутони; Въртящи се контроли; Трекболи; Окабеляване и снопове
tr: Elektronik > Atari Ekipmanları > Video Oyun Makinesi Aksesuarları: Arcade Kabini Grafikleri; Para Mekanizmaları; Kontrol Paneli Koruyucuları; Kumanda Panelleri; Joystick Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Oyun Çubukları; Oyun Afişleri; Basma Düğmeleri; Döndürücüler; İzleme Topları; Kablolama ve Kablo Demetleri
sl-SI: Elektronika > Oprema za arkadne igre > Dodatki za omarice za videoarkadne igre: Umetniške grafike za arkadne omare; Mehanizmi za kovance; Zaščite za nadzorne plošče; Nadzorne plošče; Deli in dodatki za krmilne ročice; Igralne palice; Grafični prikazi; Potisni gumbi; Spinerji; Trackballi; Ožičenje in kabelski snopi
fr: Appareil électronique > Matériel d’arcade > Accessoires pour bornes d’arcade: Habillages de borne d’arcade; Monnayeurs; Protecteurs de panneau de commande; Panneaux de commandes; Pièces et accessoires pour joysticks; Joysticks; Bandeaux défilants; Boutons-poussoirs; Commandes rotatives (spinners); Boules de commande; Câblage et faisceaux
hu: Elektronika > Arcade berendezések > Videojáték arcade szekrénykiegészítők: Játékgép-dekorációk; Érmemechanizmusok; Vezérlőpanel-védők; Vezérlőpanelek; Joystick-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Joystickok; Marquee-k; Nyomógombok; Forgó vezérlők; Trackball-vezérlők; Kábelezés és kábelkötegek
pl: Elektronika > Sprzęt do gier zręcznościowych > Akcesoria do automatów do gier zręcznościowych: Grafika gry na automatach; Mechanizmy na monety; Osłony panelu sterowania; Panele sterowania; Części i akcesoria joysticka; Joysticki; Ekrany; Przyciski; Pokrętła; Kulki trackpad; Okablowanie i wiązki
nb: Elektronikk > Spilleutstyr > Tilbehør til spillemaskinkabinetter: Kunst til spillemaskinkabinetter; Myntmekanismer; Kontrollpanelbeskyttere; Kontrollpaneler; Joystick-deler og -tilbehør; Joysticker; Marqueer; Trykknapper; Spinnere; Styrekuleenheter; Ledninger og kabler
lt-LT: Elektronika > Arkadų įranga > Vaizdo žaidimų arkadinių korpusų priedai: Arkados spintos grafika; Monetų mechanizmai; Valdymo pulto apsaugos; Valdymo skydeliai; Valdymo svirties dalys ir priedai; Vairasvirtės; Pavadinimų plakatai; Mygtukai; Suktukai; Valdymo rutuliai; Laidai ir jungtys
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Equipamento para Arcade > Acessórios para máquinas de vídeo game Arcade: Arte para gabinete arcade; Mecanismos de moeda; Protetores de painel de controle; Painéis de controle; Peças e acessórios para joystick; Joysticks; Tendas; Botões-pressão; Spinners; Trackballs; Fiação e chicotes
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εξοπλισμός Arcade > Αξεσουάρ για καμπίνες arcade βιντεοπαιχνιδιών: Διακοσμητικά καμπίνας Arcade; Μηχανισμοί νομισμάτων; Προστατευτικά πίνακα ελέγχου; Πίνακες ελέγχου; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ joystick; Joystick; Πινακίδες arcade (Marquees); Κουμπιά πίεσης; Περιστροφικοί ελεγκτές; Σφαίρες ελέγχου; Καλωδιώσεις & δεσμίδες
ja: 電子機器 > アーケードゲーム > アーケードゲーム筐体関連用品: アーケード筐体アートワーク; コインの仕組み; コントロールパネル保護カバー; 換気・空調制御盤; ジョイスティック部品とアクセサリー; ジョイスティック; マーキー; プッシュボタン; スピナー; トラックボール; 配線・ハーネス